Vermont, session 2025-2026, S103.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT; VEHICLE RUST
It is the intent of the General Assembly that rust, corrosion, or torn metal on
a motor vehicle body, frame, component, or part that is cosmetic in nature and
does not materially diminish the structural integrity of the vehicle or pose a
VT LEG #380759 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.103
2025 Page 2 of 4
material danger to the individual operating the motor vehicle, any passengers
in the motor vehicle, or other highway users shall not cause the vehicle to fail
the annual safety inspection required pursuant to 23 V.S.A. § 1222.
Sec. 2. RULEMAKING; PERIODIC INSPECTION MANUAL; VEHICLE
RUST; OUTREACH
(a) The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall, unless extended by the
Legislative Committee on Administrative Rules, adopt amendments to
Department of Motor Vehicles, Inspection of Motor Vehicles (CVR 14-050-
022) consistent with the legislative intent in Sec. 1 of this act to be effective on
or before January 1, 2026. The amendments shall:
(1) specifically address the difference between:
(A) rust, corrosion, or torn metal on a motor vehicle body, frame,
component, or part that materially diminishes the structural integrity of the
vehicle or poses a material danger to the individual operating the motor
vehicle, any passengers in the motor vehicle, or other highway users; and
(B) rust, corrosion, or torn metal on a motor vehicle body, frame,
component, or part that is cosmetic in nature and does not materially diminish
the structural integrity of the vehicle or pose a material danger to the individual
operating the motor vehicle, any passengers in the motor vehicle, or other
highway users; and
VT LEG #380759 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.103
2025 Page 3 of 4
(2) provide clear graphical examples of how to determine if rust,
corrosion, or torn metal on a motor vehicle body, frame, component, or part is
significant enough to materially diminish the structural integrity of the vehicle
or pose a material danger to the individual operating the motor vehicle, any
passengers in the motor vehicle, or other highway users.
(b) On or before January 1, 2026, the Department of Motor Vehicles shall
issue an administrative bulletin to all inspection mechanics certified by the
Commissioner of Motor Vehicles that:
(1) details the amendments to the Periodic Inspection Manual adopted
pursuant to subsection (a) of this section;
(2) explains the difference between:
(A) rust, corrosion, or torn metal on a motor vehicle body, frame,
component, or part that materially diminishes the structural integrity of the
vehicle or poses a material danger to the individual operating the motor
vehicle, any passengers in the motor vehicle, or other highway users; and
(B) rust, corrosion, or torn metal on a motor vehicle body, frame,
component, or part that is cosmetic in nature and does not materially diminish
the structural integrity of the vehicle or pose a material danger to the individual
operating the motor vehicle, any passengers in the motor vehicle, or other
highway users; and
VT LEG #380759 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.103
2025 Page 4 of 4
(3) provides information that an inspection mechanic shall provide to
the owner of a vehicle that fails inspection because of rust, corrosion, or torn
metal on the vehicle body, frame, component, or part.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380759 v.2